Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-389
Rules and regulations.

The Division of Motor Carrier Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out its powers and duties.

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 5.